Washington statutes.
RCW 35.31.060

Tax levy for fund.

The city or town council after the drawing of warrants against the accident fund shall estimate the amount necessary to pay the warrants with accrued interest thereon, and shall levy a tax sufficient to pay that amount not exceeding seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. If a single levy of seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value is not sufficient, an annual levy of seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value shall be made until the warrants and interest are fully paid.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 19; 1965 c 7 s 35.31.060. Prior: 1909 c 128 s 3; RRS s 9484.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.